test/dutch.sbl
/*
Copyright (c) 2001-2006, Dr Martin Porter and Richard Boulton. All rights
reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
are met:
1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
   notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
   documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
3. Neither the name of the Snowball project nor the names of its contributors
   may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software
   without specific prior written permission.

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND
ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR
ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES
(INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR SERVICES;
LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON
ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT
(INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE OF THIS
SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
*/


routines (
           prelude postlude
           e_ending
           en_ending
           mark_regions
           R1 R2
           undouble
           standard_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

booleans ( e_found )

integers ( p1 p2 )

groupings ( v v_I v_j )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef e"   hex 'EB'
stringdef i"   hex 'EF'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'
stringdef u"   hex 'FC'

stringdef a'   hex 'E1'
stringdef e'   hex 'E9'
stringdef i'   hex 'ED'
stringdef o'   hex 'F3'
stringdef u'   hex 'FA'

stringdef e`   hex 'E8'

define v       'aeiouy{e`}'
define v_I     v + 'I'
define v_j     v + 'j'

define prelude as (
    test repeat (
        [substring] among(
            '{a"}' '{a'}'
                (<- 'a')
            '{e"}' '{e'}'
                (<- 'e')
            '{i"}' '{i'}'
                (<- 'i')
            '{o"}' '{o'}'
                (<- 'o')
            '{u"}' '{u'}'
                (<- 'u')
            ''  (next)
        ) //or next
    )
    try(['y'] <- 'Y')
    repeat goto (
        v [('i'] v <- 'I') or
           ('y']   <- 'Y')
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try($p1 < 3  $p1 = 3)  // at least 3
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2

)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'Y'  (<- 'y')
        'I'  (<- 'i')
        ''   (next)
    ) //or next

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define undouble as (
        test among('kk' 'dd' 'tt') [next] delete
    )

    define e_ending as (
        unset e_found
        ['e'] R1 test non-v delete
        set e_found
        undouble
    )

    define en_ending as (
        R1 non-v and not 'gem' delete
        undouble
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        do (
            [substring] among(
                'heden'
                (   R1 <- 'heid'
                )
                'en' 'ene'
                (   en_ending
                )
                's' 'se'
                (   R1 non-v_j delete
                )
            )
        )
        do e_ending

        do ( ['heid'] R2 not 'c' delete
             ['en'] en_ending
           )

        do (
            [substring] among(
                'end' 'ing'
                (   R2 delete
                    (['ig'] R2 not 'e' delete) or undouble
                )
                'ig'
                (   R2 not 'e' delete
                )
                'lijk'
                (   R2 delete e_ending
                )
                'baar'
                (   R2 delete
                )
                'bar'
                (   R2 e_found delete
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            non-v_I
            test (
                among ('aa' 'ee' 'oo' 'uu')
                non-v
            )
            [next] delete
        )
    )
)

define stem as (

        do prelude
        do mark_regions
        backwards
            do standard_suffix
        do postlude
)
